Illinois, session 104th, HB5572.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Program of All-Inclusive Care for the 5Elderly Act is amended by adding Section 22 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 40/22 new)7    Sec. 22. PACE Advisory Board.8    (a) The Director of Healthcare and Family Services shall 9appoint a PACE Advisory Board to consult with the Department 10on the administration of this Act.11    (b) The Advisory Board shall be composed of the following 12persons: 13        (1) the Director of Healthcare and Family Services, or 14    his or her designee, who shall serve as chairperson, ex 15    officio, and as a nonvoting member;16        (2) one representative each of the Department on Aging 17    and the Department of Human Services, as nonvoting 18    members;19        (3) three members who shall be selected from the 20    recommendations of a statewide organization representing 21    PACE providers;22        (4) two members who represent the general public and 23    who have no responsibility for management or formation of   HB5572- 2 -LRB104 18151 RPS 31590 b1    policy or financial interest in a PACE organization;2        (5) one member who is a PACE participant or a 3    participant's legal guardian; and4        (6) one member who shall be selected from the 5    recommendations of consumer organizations that engage in 6    advocacy on behalf of the elderly. 7    (c) The Advisory Board shall meet as frequently as the 8chairperson deems necessary, but not less than 4 times each 9year. Upon request by 4 or more members, the chairperson shall 10call a meeting of the Advisory Board. The affirmative vote of a 11simple majority of the appointed voting members shall be 12necessary for Advisory Board action. A quorum shall be a 13majority of the appointed voting members. A member of the 14Advisory Board may designate a replacement to serve at the 15Advisory Board meeting and vote in place of the member by 16submitting a letter of designation to the chairperson prior to 17or at the Advisory Board meeting.18    (d) The Advisory Board shall advise the Department on all 19aspects of its responsibilities under this Act, including, but 20not limited to, the format and content of any rules adopted by 21the Department and the development of capitation rate 22methodologies. Any such rules, except emergency rules adopted 23under Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 24Act, adopted without obtaining the advice of the Advisory 25Board are null and void. If the Department fails to follow the 26advice of the Advisory Board, the Department shall, prior to   HB5572- 3 -LRB104 18151 RPS 31590 b1the adoption of the rules, transmit a written explanation of 2the reason therefor to the Advisory Board. During its review 3of rules or rate methodologies, the Advisory Board shall 4analyze the economic and regulatory impact of those actions on 5the sustainability of PACE organizations and the quality of 6care provided to participants. If the Advisory Board, having 7been asked for its advice, fails to advise the Department 8within 90 days, the rules shall be considered acted upon.